Arkansas, session 2025, HB1801.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 92, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
17-92-121. Outsourcing facility of legend drugs and controlled
substances.
(a) As used in this section, "outsourcing facility of legend drugs and
controlled substances" means an entity that is registered as a 503B
outsourcing facility with the United States Food and Drug Administration and
has a permit with the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy.
(b)(1) An outsourcing facility of legend drugs and controlled
substances that compounds a product may sell a compounded product to:
(A) An Arkansas-licensed retail pharmacy for dispensing to
a patient;
(B) An Arkansas-licensed healthcare facility for
administration to a patient; or
*JMB495*
04-09-2025 18:29:06 JMB495

As Engrossed: S4/9/25 HB1801
(C) An Arkansas-licensed healthcare provider, such as a
physician or nurse practitioner, for administration to a patient in a medical
clinic.
(2) With the exception of the entities listed in subdivision
(b)(1) of this section, an outsourcing facility of legend drugs and
controlled substances shall not sell a compounded drug to a wholesale
distributor, pharmaceutical repackager, pharmaceutical relabeler, marketing
firm, or any other entity.
(c) An outsourcing facility of legend drugs and controlled substances
shall comply with the Current Good Manufacturing Practices regulations in 21
C.F.R. Part 210, 21 C.F.R. Part 211, and 21 C.F.R. Part 212, as existing on
January 1, 2025.
(d) The board shall adopt rules pertaining to an Arkansas-licensed
retail pharmacy dispensing a compound obtained from an outsourcing facility
of legend drugs and controlled substances to a patient, including without
limitation requiring:
(1) Patient education on the compound;
(2) The name of the outsourcing facility of legend drugs and
controlled substances preparing the compound; and
(3) Any other item related to the dispensing of a compound by an
outsourcing facility of legend drugs and controlled substances deemed
necessary by the board.

/s/K. Moore












04-09-2025 18:29:06 JMB495